Connecticut, session 2026, SB00299.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 22a-245 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(a) No person shall establish or operate a redemption center without
receiving approval to operate such a redemption center and annually
registering with the commissioner on a form provided by the
commissioner with such information as the commissioner deems
necessary, including (1) the name of the business principals of the
redemption center and the address of the business; (2) the name and
address of the sponsors and dealers to be served by the redemption
center; (3) the types of beverage containers to be accepted; (4) the hours
of operation; and (5) whether beverage containers will be accepted from
consumers. The operator of the redemption center shall report to the
commissioner any change in the information described in subdivisions
(1) to (4), inclusive, of this subsection not later than forty-eight hours
after such change. On and after July 1, 2026, each registered owner of a
redemption center shall submit an application to the Commissioner of
Energy and Environmental Protection for the issuance of a license to

Senate Bill No. 299
operate such redemption center. Such application shall be on a form, as
prescribed by the commissioner, which shall, at a minimum, require the
submission of the information described in subdivisions (1) to (5),
inclusive, of this subsection. Each such application shall be accompanied
by an application fee of two thousand five hundred dollars. Upon the
issuance of any such license, any such registration shall be deemed
terminated. On and after July 1, 2026, any person who seeks to operate
a redemption center that was not registered with the commissioner prior
to the effective date of this section shall submit such an application for
a license to operate such redemption center in accordance with the
requirements of this subsection. The commissioner may suspend the
license or impose a civil penalty, or both, against any person who owns
or operates a redemption center in violation of any licensure
requirement established by the commissioner or the provisions of this
section. Any person establishing a redemption center shall have the
right to determine what kind, size and brand of beverage container shall
be accepted, except such person shall not accept any beverage container
that: (A) Such person knows or has reason to know was not originally
sold in this state as a filled beverage container, (B) was previously
redeemed, (C) is damaged in any manner that prevents the reading or
scanning of such container's barcode, or (D) is on a list of beverage
containers provided by a deposit initiator to such redemption center as
not being available for sale in this state. Any redemption center may be
established to serve all persons or to serve certain specified dealers and
shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter. Any redemption
center that accepts more than [two thousand five hundred] one
thousand containers from any one individual in one day shall create and
obtain from such person a record of such person's name, the license
plate number of any vehicle used to transport the containers to such
redemption center, a copy of such person's driver's license, the collection
points of the empty containers and the number of containers tendered.
All beverage containers transported in a single vehicle shall be treated
as being attributable to one individual for purposes of this subsection.
Public Act No. 26-2 2 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
The redemption center shall obtain from such person a certification that,
to the best of such person's knowledge, the beverage containers were
originally sold as filled beverages in this state and were not previously
redeemed. No redemption center shall accept more than [five] four
thousand containers in any one day from any person except for a
nonprofit organization or a verified fundraising activity. Each
redemption center and reverse vending machine operator shall retain
the records required by this subsection for a period of not less than two
years and such records for redemptions of more than one thousand
beverage containers from any one individual in one day, including any
such certification, shall be transmitted by such redemption center to the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection each calendar
quarter. The failure by any redemption center to transmit any records
on a quarterly basis to the commissioner may result in the revocation of
such redemption center's license by the commissioner. The
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, the Attorney
General, the Chief State's Attorney and any state or municipal law
enforcement agency may examine the accounts and records of any
redemption center and reverse vending machine operator that are
maintained pursuant to this section or any provision of this chapter,
including, but not limited to, any related accounts and records including
receipts, disbursements and any other item the commissioner deems
appropriate.
(b) A dealer shall not refuse to accept at such dealer's place of
business, from any person any empty beverage containers of the kind,
size and brand sold by the dealer, or refuse to pay to such person the
refund value of a beverage container unless (1) such container contains
materials which are foreign to the normal contents of the container; (2)
such container is not labeled in accordance with subsection (b) of section
22a-244; (3) such dealer sponsors, solely or with others, a redemption
center which is located within a one-mile radius of such place of
business and which accepts beverage containers of the kind, size and
Public Act No. 26-2 3 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
brand sold by such dealer at such place of business; [or] (4) there is
established by others, a redemption center which is located within a
one-mile radius of such place of business and which accepts beverage
containers of the kind, size and brand sold by such dealer at such place
of business; (5) such dealer knows or has reason to know that a beverage
container was not originally sold in this state as a filled beverage
container; (6) such beverage container was previously redeemed; (7)
such beverage container is damaged in any manner that prevents the
reading or scanning of such container's barcode; or (8) such beverage
container is on a list of beverage containers provided by a deposit
initiator to such dealer as not being available for sale in this state. A
dealer shall redeem an empty container of a kind, size or brand the sale
of which has been discontinued by such dealer for not less than sixty
days after the last sale by the dealer of such kind, size or brand of
beverage container. Sixty days before such date, the dealer shall post, at
the point of sale, notice of the last date on which the discontinued kind,
size or brand of beverage container shall be redeemed.
(c) A distributor shall not refuse to accept from a dealer or from an
operator of a redemption center, located and operated exclusively
within the territory of the distributor or whose operator certifies to the
distributor that redeemed containers were from a dealer located within
such territory, any empty beverage containers of the kind, size and
brand sold by the distributor, or refuse to pay to such dealer or
redemption center operator the refund value of a beverage container
unless: [such] (1) Such container contains materials which are foreign to
the normal contents of the container, [or unless] (2) such container is not
labeled in accordance with subsection (b) of section 22a-244, (3) such
beverage container was previously redeemed, (4) such beverage
container is damaged in any manner that prevents the reading or
scanning of such container's barcode, or (5) such beverage container is
on a list of beverage containers that such distributor previously
provided to redemption centers and dealers as not being available for
Public Act No. 26-2 4 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
sale in this state. A distributor shall remove any empty beverage
container from the premises of a dealer serviced by the distributor or
from the premises of a redemption center sponsored by dealers serviced
by the distributor, provided such premises are located within the
territory of the distributor. No redemption center shall remove any
beverage container from its premises or transfer such containers
between premises under its control before tendering such containers for
removal by a distributor unless authorized to do so, in writing, by the
distributor. A copy of any such written authorization shall be forwarded
to the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection by the
owner or operator of such redemption center. The distributor shall pay
the refund value to dealers in accordance with the schedule for payment
by the dealer to the distributor for full beverage containers and shall pay
such refund value to operators of redemption centers not more than
twenty days after receipt of the empty container. For the purposes of
this subsection, a redemption center shall be considered to be sponsored
by a dealer if [(1)] (A) the dealer refuses to redeem beverage containers
and refers consumers to the redemption center, or [(2)] (B) there is an
agreement between the dealer and the operator of the redemption center
requiring the redemption center to remove empty beverage containers
from the premises of the dealer. A distributor shall redeem an empty
container of a kind, size or brand of beverage container the sale of which
has been discontinued by the distributor for not less than one hundred
fifty days after the last delivery of such kind, size or brand of beverage
container. Not less than one hundred twenty days before the last date
such containers may be redeemed, the distributor shall notify such
dealer who bought the discontinued kind, size or brand of beverage
container that such distributor shall not redeem an empty beverage
container of such kind, size or brand of beverage containers.
(d) (1) In addition to the refund value of a beverage container, a
distributor shall pay to any dealer or operator of a redemption center a
handling fee of at least two and one-half cents for each container of beer,
Public Act No. 26-2 5 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
hard seltzer, hard cider or other malt beverage and three and one-half
cents for each beverage container of mineral waters, soda water and
similar carbonated soft drinks or noncarbonated beverage returned for
redemption. A distributor shall not be required to pay to a manufacturer
the refund value of a nonrefillable beverage container.
(2) For the period commencing April 1, 2026, and ending June 30,
2027, the handling fee paid by a distributor for any beverage container
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection to any redemption center
that, on average, annually processes fifty million or more beverage
containers, as confirmed by the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection in consultation with the Department of
Revenue Services, and that does not utilize automated barcode or
universal product code scanning for the redemption of all such beverage
containers shall be reduced by not more than one cent. On and after July
1, 2027, any such reduction in the handling fee shall discontinue,
provided such redemption center utilizes automated barcode or
universal product code scanning for the redemption of all such beverage
containers.
(e) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall
adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
implement the provisions of sections 22a-243 to 22a-245, inclusive, as
amended by this act. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited
to, provisions for the redemption of beverage containers dispensed
through automatic reverse vending machines, the use of vending
machines that reimburse consumers for the redemption value of
beverage containers, scheduling for redemption by dealers and
distributors and for exemptions or modifications to the labeling
requirement of section 22a-244.
(f) For the purposes of this section, "refund value" means the refund
value established by subsection (a) of section 22a-244.
Public Act No. 26-2 6 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b) to (d),
inclusive, of this section, no person shall tender to a dealer, redemption
center, reverse vending machine, distributor or deposit initiator for the
purpose of obtaining a refund value or handling fee for any empty
beverage container that the person knows or has reason to know was
not originally sold in this state as a filled beverage container or that was
previously redeemed through a dealer, redemption center, reverse
vending machine, distributor or deposit initiator. Any violation of the
provisions of this subsection by any dealer or redemption center shall
be deemed an unfair or deceptive trade practice under subsection (a) of
section 42-110b.
(h) Each dealer, redemption center or reverse vending machine
operator shall post where empty containers are redeemed a conspicuous
"Redemption Warning" sign using at least a one-inch font that states the
following: "Returning empty beverage containers for refund that were
not purchased in Connecticut or that were previously redeemed is
illegal. Any person who returns empty beverage containers that the
person knows or has reason to know were not originally sold in this
state as filled beverage containers or that were previously redeemed
shall be subject to fines and state enforcement action. Connecticut
General Statutes section 22a-245.".
(i) Each operator of a redemption center shall report quarterly to the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, on a form
provided by the commissioner, the number and type of containers such
operator redeems, aggregated by each town in which such operator
operates, each record created by such redemption center pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section and any such other redemption information
the commissioner deems necessary. Any redemption center that fails to
submit a quarterly report pursuant to this subsection may be denied an
annual [registration] license pursuant to this section.
(j) (1) The Attorney General may, independently or upon complaint
Public Act No. 26-2 7 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
of the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection or the
Commissioner of Revenue Services, investigate the facts and
circumstances concerning any alleged violation of a provision of this
section. The Attorney General may issue subpoenas and written
interrogatories in connection with such investigation, in the same
manner and to the same extent as provided in section 35-42, provided
no information obtained pursuant to the provisions of this subsection
may be used in a criminal proceeding.
(2) If the Attorney General finds that a person has violated a
provision of this section, the Attorney General may bring a civil action
in the superior court for the judicial district in which such violation was
committed.
(k) No owner or operator of any redemption center shall utilize bulk
bailing for the processing of beverage containers at such redemption
center.
Sec. 2. Section 22a-245a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Each deposit initiator shall open a special interest-bearing account
at a Connecticut branch of a financial institution, as defined in section
45a-557a, to the credit of the deposit initiator. Each deposit initiator shall
deposit in such account an amount equal to the refund value established
pursuant to subsection (a) of section 22a-244, for each beverage
container sold by such deposit initiator. Such deposit shall be made not
more than one month after the date such beverage container is sold,
provided for any beverage container sold during the period from
December 1, 2008, to December 31, 2008, inclusive, such deposit shall be
made not later than January 5, 2009. All interest, dividends and returns
earned on the special account shall be paid directly into such account.
Such moneys shall be kept separate and apart from all other moneys in
the possession of the deposit initiator. The amount required to be
Public Act No. 26-2 8 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
deposited pursuant to this section, when deposited, shall be held to be
a special fund in trust for the state.
(b) (1) Any reimbursement of the refund value for a redeemed
beverage container shall be paid from the deposit initiator's special
account, with such payment to be computed, subject to the provisions
of subdivision (2) of this subsection, under the cash receipts and
disbursements method of accounting, as described in Section 446(c)(1)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding
Internal Revenue Code of the United States, as amended from time to
time.
(2) A deposit initiator may petition the Commissioner of Revenue
Services for an alternate method of accounting by filing with such
deposit initiator's return a statement of objections and other proposed
alternate method of accounting, as such deposit initiator believes proper
and equitable under the circumstances, that is accompanied by
supporting details and proof. The Commissioner of Revenue Services
shall promptly notify such deposit initiator whether the proposed
alternate method is accepted as reasonable and equitable and, if so
accepted, shall adjust such deposit initiator's return and payment of
reimbursement accordingly.
(c) Not later than August 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall calculate
and publish the average state-wide redemption rate for the preceding
fiscal year, calculated as the number of beverage containers redeemed
for the deposit divided by the number of beverage containers sold.
(d) (1) Each deposit initiator shall submit a report on March 15, 2009,
for the period from December 1, 2008, to February 28, 2009, inclusive.
Each deposit initiator shall submit a report on July 31, 2009, for the
period from March 1, 2009, to June 30, 2009, inclusive, and thereafter
shall submit a quarterly report for the immediately preceding calendar
Public Act No. 26-2 9 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
quarter one month after the close of such quarter. Each such report shall
be submitted to the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection, on a form prescribed by the commissioner and with such
information as the commissioner deems necessary, including, but not
limited to: (A) The balance in the special account at the beginning of the
quarter for which the report is prepared; (B) a list of all deposits credited
to such account during such quarter, including all refund values paid to
the deposit initiator and all interest, dividends or returns received on
the account; (C) a list of all withdrawals from such account during such
quarter, all service charges and overdraft charges on the account and all
payments made pursuant to subsection (e) of this section; and (D) the
balance in the account at the close of the quarter for which the report is
prepared.
(2) Each deposit initiator shall submit a report on October 31, 2010,
for the calendar quarter beginning July 1, 2010. Subsequently, each
deposit initiator shall submit a quarterly report for the immediately
preceding calendar quarter, on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding the close of such quarter. Each such report shall be
submitted to the Commissioner of Revenue Services, on a form
prescribed by the Commissioner of Revenue Services, and with such
information as the Commissioner of Revenue Services deems necessary,
including, but not limited to, the following information: (A) The balance
in the special account at the beginning of the quarter for which the
report is prepared, (B) all deposits credited to such account during such
quarter, including all refund values paid to the deposit initiator and all
interest, dividends or returns received on such account, (C) all
withdrawals from such account during such quarter, including all
service charges and overdraft charges on such account and all payments
made pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, and (D) the balance in
such account at the close of the quarter for which the report is prepared.
Such quarterly report shall be filed electronically with the
Commissioner of Revenue Services, in the manner provided by chapter
Public Act No. 26-2 10 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
228g.
(e) (1) On or before April 30, 2009, each deposit initiator shall pay the
balance outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the
period from December 1, 2008, to March 31, 2009, inclusive, to the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection for deposit in
the General Fund. Thereafter, the balance outstanding in the special
account that is attributable to the immediately preceding calendar
quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator one month after the close
of such quarter to the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection for deposit in the General Fund. If the amount of the required
payment pursuant to this subdivision is not paid by the date seven days
after the due date, a penalty of ten per cent of the amount due shall be
added to the amount due. The amount due shall bear interest at the rate
of one and one-half per cent per month or fraction thereof, from the due
date. Any such penalty or interest shall not be paid from funds
maintained in the special account.
(2) (A) On or before October 31, 2010, each deposit initiator shall pay
the balance outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the
period from July 1, 2010, to September 30, 2010, inclusive, to the
Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the General Fund.
(B) Subsequently:
(i) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, ninety-five per cent of the
balance outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the
immediately preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit
initiator on or before the last day of the month next succeeding the close
of such quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in
the General Fund;
(ii) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, (I) for the calendar
quarters ending September 30, 2023, and December 31, 2023, the
Public Act No. 26-2 11 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
balances outstanding in the special account that are attributable to said
calendar quarters shall be retained in the special account by the deposit
initiator for the purpose of reimbursement of the refund value in effect
on January 1, 2024, for a redeemed beverage container in accordance
with the provisions of subsection (b) of this section and section 22a-244,
(II) for the calendar quarter ending March 31, 2024, sixty-five per cent of
the balance outstanding in the special account at the close of such
quarter, including any balance outstanding that is attributable to such
quarter and any remaining balance of the amount retained by the
deposit initiator pursuant to subclause (I) of this clause, shall be paid by
the deposit initiator on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding the close of such quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue
Services for deposit in the General Fund, and (III) for the calendar
quarter ending June 30, 2024, sixty-five per cent of the balance
outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the immediately
preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or
before the last day of the month next succeeding the close of such
quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the
General Fund;
(iii) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, fifty per cent of the
balance outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the
immediately preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit
initiator on or before the last day of the month next succeeding the close
of such quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in
the General Fund;
(iv) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, if the redemption rate
calculated under subsection (c) of this section for the preceding fiscal
year is:
(I) At least sixty per cent, twenty-five per cent of the balance
outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the immediately
preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or
Public Act No. 26-2 12 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
before the last day of the month next succeeding the close of such
quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the
General Fund; and
(II) Less than sixty per cent, forty-five per cent of the balance
outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the immediately
preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or
before the last day of the month next succeeding the close of such
quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the
General Fund;
(v) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, if the redemption rate
calculated under subsection (c) of this section for the preceding fiscal
year is:
(I) At least sixty-five per cent, [five] twenty-five per cent of the
balance outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the
immediately preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit
initiator on or before the last day of the month next succeeding the close
of such quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in
the General Fund;
(II) Less than sixty-five per cent but more than sixty per cent, [twenty-
five] thirty-five per cent of the balance outstanding in the special
account that is attributable to the immediately preceding calendar
quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or before the last day of
the month next succeeding the close of such quarter to the
Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the General Fund; and
(III) Sixty per cent or less, forty-five per cent of the balance
outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the immediately
preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or
before the last day of the month next succeeding the close of such
quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the
Public Act No. 26-2 13 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
General Fund; and
(vi) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028, and each fiscal year
thereafter, if the redemption rate calculated under subsection (c) of this
section for the preceding fiscal year is:
(I) At least seventy-five per cent, five per cent of the balance
outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the immediately
preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or
before the last day of the month next succeeding the close of such
quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the
General Fund;
(II) Less than seventy-five per cent but more than sixty-five per cent,
ten per cent of the balance outstanding in the special account that is
attributable to the immediately preceding calendar quarter shall be paid
by the deposit initiator on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding the close of such quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue
Services for deposit in the General Fund;
(III) Sixty-five per cent or less but more than sixty per cent, twenty-
five per cent of the balance outstanding in the special account that is
attributable to the immediately preceding calendar quarter shall be paid
by the deposit initiator on or before the last day of the month next
succeeding the close of such quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue
Services for deposit in the General Fund; and
(IV) Sixty per cent or less, forty-five per cent of the balance
outstanding in the special account that is attributable to the immediately
preceding calendar quarter shall be paid by the deposit initiator on or
before the last day of the month next succeeding the close of such
quarter to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for deposit in the
General Fund.
(C) If the amount of the required payment pursuant to this
Public Act No. 26-2 14 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
subdivision is not paid on or before the due date, a penalty of ten per
cent of the amount due and unpaid, or fifty dollars, whichever is greater,
shall be imposed. The amount due and unpaid shall bear interest at the
rate of one per cent per month or fraction thereof, from the due date.
Any such penalty or interest shall not be paid from funds maintained in
such special account. Such required payment shall be made by
electronic funds transfer to the Commissioner of Revenue Services, in
the manner provided by chapter 228g.
(f) If moneys deposited in the special account are insufficient to pay
for withdrawals authorized pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
the amount of such deficiency shall be subtracted from the next
succeeding payment or payments due pursuant to subsection (e) of this
section until the amount of the deficiency has been subtracted in full.
(g) The Commissioner of Revenue Services may examine the accounts
and records of any deposit initiator maintained under this section or
sections 22a-243 to 22a-245, inclusive, as amended by this act, and any
related accounts and records, including receipts, disbursements and
such other items as the Commissioner of Revenue Services deems
appropriate.
(h) The Attorney General may, independently or upon complaint of
the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection or the
Commissioner of Revenue Services, institute any appropriate action or
proceeding to enforce any provision of this section or any regulation
adopted pursuant to section 22a-245, as amended by this act, to
implement the provisions of this section.
(i) The provisions of sections 12-548, 12-550 to 12-554, inclusive, and
12-555a shall be deemed to apply to the provisions of this section, except
any provision of sections 12-548, 12-550 to 12-554, inclusive, and 12-555a
that is inconsistent with the provision in this section.
Public Act No. 26-2 15 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
(j) Any payment required pursuant to this section shall be treated as
a tax for purposes of sections 12-30b, 12-33a, 12-35a, 12-39g and 12-39h.
(k) Not later than July 1, 2010, the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection or successor agency shall establish a
procedure that allows each such deposit initiator to take a credit against
any payment made pursuant to subsection (e) of this section in the
amount of the deposits refunded on beverage containers which such
deposit initiator donated for any charitable purpose.
(l) (1) On or before July 15, 2026, any eligible deposit initiator may
apply to the Commissioner of Revenue Services for a rebate against the
tax imposed under this section. For purposes of this subsection, "eligible
deposit initiator" means a deposit initiator that (A) derived not less than
eighty per cent of such deposit initiator's revenue for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, from the distribution of beer, ale, wine or distilled
spirits, and (B) properly reported a negative balance in such deposit
initiator's special account, for the calendar quarter ending June 30, 2026.
(2) On or before August 15, 2026, the Commissioner of Revenue
Services shall review each application submitted pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection and determine which deposit initiators
are eligible for such rebate pursuant to this subsection. Any rebate
allowable under this subsection shall be equal to the amount of the
negative balance properly reported in such eligible deposit initiator's
special account for the calendar quarter ending June 30, 2026, provided
the sum of all rebates allowed under this subsection shall not exceed
eighty per cent of the revenue projected for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, under this section, as determined on the consensus revenue
estimate issued April 30, 2026. If the sum of negative balances reported
by eligible deposit initiators exceeds said maximum amount, the
commissioner shall reduce the rebate available to each such eligible
deposit initiator under this subsection on a pro rata basis. Each such
eligible deposit initiator shall reduce any such negative balance for such
Public Act No. 26-2 16 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
special account by the amount of the rebate allowed under this section.
(3) The Commissioner of Revenue Services shall inform each eligible
deposit initiator, in writing, of the amount of the rebate such eligible
deposit initiator is allowed under this subsection. Such rebate shall be
claimed as a rebate on a form and in a manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Revenue Services.
(m) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, in
consultation with the Commissioner of Revenue Services, may require
reporting from deposit initiators and owners or operators of redemption
centers that shall be in addition to any reporting requirements of this
section or section 22a-245, as amended by this act. Any such additional
reporting requirements shall be in furtherance of the requirements and
purposes of this section and section 22a-245, as amended by this act.
Sec. 3. Section 22a-246 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Any person who violates any provision of section 22a-244, 22a-245,
as amended by this act, or 22a-245a, as amended by this act, shall be
fined or assessed a civil penalty of not less than [fifty] five hundred
dollars nor more than [one hundred] seven hundred fifty dollars, and
for a second offense shall be fined or assessed a civil penalty of not less
than [one hundred] seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than [two
hundred] one thousand dollars and for a third or subsequent offense
shall be fined or assessed a civil penalty of not less than two [hundred
fifty dollars or more than five hundred dollars] thousand dollars and
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor. The Attorney General, upon
complaint of the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection, shall institute a civil action to recover any civil penalty
assessed by the commissioner pursuant to this section. On and after the
effective date of this section, in addition to any other enforcement of the
provisions of this section by any state agency or state police officer, any
Public Act No. 26-2 17 of 18

Senate Bill No. 299
municipal police officer may enforce the provisions of this section and
any fine issued by any such municipal police officer shall be payable to
the respective municipality.
Sec. 4. Subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 404 of public act 25-
168 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
from passage):
(b) (1) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the Treasurer shall
transfer two million dollars from the General Fund to the bottle bill
escheats enforcement and assistance account. The Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management shall [disburse] transfer two hundred fifty
thousand dollars of such amount to [said division] the Department of
Energy and Environmental Protection to be used for the purpose [set
forth in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section] of designing,
implementing and operating redemption center licensing. The
remainder shall be used for reimbursement grants in accordance with
the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection.
Governor's Action:
Approved March 3, 2026
Public Act No. 26-2 18 of 18